Wisconsin, session 2025, SB156.
do enact as follows:SB156,11Section 1. 255.075 of the statutes is created to read:SB156,2,32255.075 Use of epinephrine delivery systems by first responders. (1) 3In this section:SB156,2,54(a) “Administer” means to directly apply an epinephrine delivery system to 5the body of an individual.SB156,2,66(b) “Epinephrine delivery system” has the meaning given in s. 255.07 (1) (cm).SB156,2,77(c) “First responder” means any of the following:SB156,2,881. Conservation warden under s. 23.10.SB156,2,992. Correctional officer, as defined in s. 102.475 (8) (a).SB156,2,10103. Emergency medical responder, as defined in s. 256.01 (4p).SB156,2,11114. Emergency medical services practitioner, as defined in s. 256.01 (5).SB156,2,12125. Firefighter, as defined in s. 36.27 (3m) (a) 1m.SB156,2,13136. Law enforcement officer, as defined in s. 165.85 (2) (c).SB156,2,1714(2) The department shall identify organizations that conduct trainings, either 15online or in person, that cover all of the subjects required under sub. (3). The 16department shall compile a list of all organizations identified under this subsection, 17post the list on the department’s website, and update the list as necessary.SB156,2,1818(3) Each first responder shall be trained in all of the following:SB156,2,2019(a) How to recognize signs and symptoms of severe allergic reactions, 20including anaphylaxis.SB156,2,2221(b) Standards and procedures for the storage and administration of an 22epinephrine delivery system.SB156,3,21(c) Emergency follow-up procedures after an epinephrine delivery system is 2administered.SB156,3,43(4) Each first responder shall have an epinephrine delivery system available 4to the first responder for use at all times while on duty.SB156,3,85(5) From the appropriation under s. 20.435 (1) (a), the department may 6distribute epinephrine delivery systems to first responders who are trained in all 7subjects described under sub. (3) or to employers of first responders who are trained 8in all subjects described under sub. (3) to be administered by those first responders.SB156,3,99